Oklahoma, session 2026, SB28.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-119, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-119. A. Funds appropriated to the State Board of


Education for School Lunch Matching school lunch matching and School


Lunch Programs school lunch programs shall be apportioned by the


State Board of Education to each school district for the purpose of


providing meals for children in compliance with the National School


Lunch Act and the Child Nutrition Act of 1966 and Public Law 91-248,


as they may hereafter be amended or supplemented.


B. For the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years, school


districts shall provide meals at no cost to a child who is a member

Req. No. 275 Page 1


of a household in which the total annual income during the preceding


tax year did not exceed an amount equal to two hundred fifty percent


(250%) of the federal poverty level. Funds shall be apportioned by


the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection A of this


section to each school district for the purposes of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-275 EB 12/16/2024 12:18:49 PM

























Req. No. 275 Page 2